Nebraska, session 109, LB700.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB700 LB700
2025 2025
Section 1. (1) This section applies beginning January 1, 2026.
(2) Any criminal prosecution of a person who was under eighteen
years of age when the alleged offense was committed shall be conducted in
such a manner as to maintain the confidentiality of the identity of the
defendant. This applies to all stages of such proceedings, including
before, during, or after trial, sentencing, and post-conviction
proceedings.
(3) A court shall release information required to be confidential by
this section:
(a) To any individual; public or private agency, institution,
facility, or clinic; or governmental entity which is providing services
directly to the defendant;
(b) To any court which has jurisdiction of the defendant upon such
court's request;
(c) Upon written request by the office of Public Counsel, including
the office of Inspector General of Nebraska Child Welfare and office of
Inspector General of the Nebraska Correctional System;
(d) To any person, at the request of the defendant;
(e) To law enforcement officers, county attorneys, and city
attorneys;
(f) To the Nebraska Probation System, the Department of Correctional
Services, a jail, or other detention facility as necessary for the
custody and care of such defendant;
(g) To the Department of Health and Human Services or a contract
facility or provider when the defendant is undergoing competency
restoration as provided in section 29-1823;
(h) To persons engaged in bona fide research, with the permission of
the court or the State Court Administrator, only if the research results
in no disclosure of the defendant's identity and protects the
confidentiality of the defendant; and
(i) To a law enforcement agency if the defendant applies for
-2-

LB700 LB700
2025 2025
employment with the law enforcement agency.
(4) Any person receiving confidential information under subsection
(3) of this section shall maintain the confidentiality of such
information and of the defendant's identity.
(5) This section does not apply to presentence investigation
reports, the confidentiality of which are governed by section 29-2261.
(6) Nothing in this section shall be construed to restrict
dissemination of information about a defendant who is a fugitive from
justice or otherwise missing.
Sec. 2. Section 28-105.01, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
28-105.01 (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the death
penalty or life imprisonment shall not be imposed upon any person who was
under the age of twenty-two eighteen years at the time of the commission
of the crime.
(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the death penalty
shall not be imposed upon any person with an intellectual disability.
(3) As used in subsection (2) of this section, intellectual
disability means significantly subaverage general intellectual
functioning existing concurrently with deficits in adaptive behavior. An
intelligence quotient of seventy or below on a reliably administered
intelligence quotient test shall be presumptive evidence of intellectual
disability.
(4) If (a) a jury renders a verdict finding the existence of one or
more aggravating circumstances as provided in section 29-2520 or (b)(i)
the information contains a notice of aggravation as provided in section
29-1603 and (ii) the defendant waives his or her right to a jury
determination of the alleged aggravating circumstances, the court shall
hold a hearing prior to any sentencing determination proceeding as
provided in section 29-2521 upon a verified motion of the defense
requesting a ruling that the penalty of death be precluded under
-3-

LB700 LB700
2025 2025
subsection (2) of this section. If the court finds, by a preponderance of
the evidence, that the defendant is a person with an intellectual
disability, the death sentence shall not be imposed. A ruling by the
court that the evidence of diminished intelligence introduced by the
defendant does not preclude the death penalty under subsection (2) of
this section shall not restrict the defendant's opportunity to introduce
such evidence at the sentencing determination proceeding as provided in
section 29-2521 or to argue that such evidence should be given mitigating
significance.
Sec. 3. Section 28-105.02, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
28-105.02 (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the
penalty for any person convicted of a Class IA felony for an offense
committed when such person was under the age of twenty-two eighteen years
shall be a maximum sentence of not greater than eighty years' life
imprisonment and a minimum sentence of not greater less than forty years'
imprisonment.
(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the penalty for any
person convicted of a Class IB felony for an offense committed when such
person was under the age of twenty-two years shall be a maximum sentence
of not greater than sixty years' imprisonment and a minimum sentence of
not greater than twenty years' imprisonment, except as provided in
section 28-319.01.
(3) (2) In determining the sentence of a convicted person under
subsection (1) of this section, the court shall consider mitigating
factors which led to the commission of the offense. The convicted person
may submit mitigating factors to the court, including, but not limited
to:
(a) The convicted person's age at the time of the offense;
(b) The impetuosity of the convicted person;
(c) The convicted person's family and community environment;
-4-

LB700 LB700
2025 2025
(d) The convicted person's ability to appreciate the risks and
consequences of the conduct;
(e) The convicted person's intellectual capacity; and
(f) The outcome of a comprehensive mental health evaluation of the
convicted person conducted by an adolescent mental health professional
licensed in this state. The evaluation shall include, but not be limited
to, interviews with the convicted person's family in order to learn about
the convicted person's prenatal history, developmental history, medical
history, substance abuse treatment history, if any, social history, and
psychological history.
Sec. 4. Section 29-401, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
29-401 Every sheriff, deputy sheriff, marshal, deputy marshal,
security guard, police officer, or peace officer as defined in
subdivision (15) of section 49-801 shall arrest and detain any person
found violating any law of this state or any legal ordinance of any city
or incorporated village until a legal warrant can be obtained, except
that (1) any such law enforcement officer taking a juvenile under the age
of eighteen years into his or her custody for any violation herein
defined shall proceed as set forth in sections 43-248, 43-248.01, 43-250,
43-251, 43-251.01, and 43-253 and (2) the court in which the juvenile is
to appear shall not accept a plea from the juvenile until finding that
the parent, guardian, or custodian parents of the juvenile has have been
notified or that reasonable efforts to notify such person has parents
have been made as provided in section 43-250.
Sec. 5. (1) For purposes of this section:
(a) Custodial interrogation has the meaning prescribed to it under
the Fourth and Fifth Amendments to the Constitution of the United States
and Article I, sections 3 and 7, of the Constitution of Nebraska, as
interpreted by the Supreme Court of the United States and the Nebraska
Supreme Court; and
-5-

LB700 LB700
2025 2025
(b) Young adult means a person who is eighteen years of age or older
and younger than twenty-two years of age.
(2) All law enforcement personnel or other governmental officials
having custody of any young adult shall inform the young adult, using
developmentally appropriate language and without unnecessary delay, of
such young adult's right to call or consult an attorney who is retained
by or appointed on behalf of such young adult or whom the young adult may
desire to consult and, except when exigent circumstances exist, shall
permit such young adult to call or consult such attorney without delay.
An attorney shall be permitted to see and consult with the young adult in
custody alone and in private at the place of custody.
(3) Before initiating a custodial interrogation of the young adult,
law enforcement personnel shall provide an advisement to the young adult
in substantially the following form:
"1. You have the right to remain silent, which means you do not have
to say anything to me unless you want to. It is your choice.
2. If you choose to talk to me, whatever you tell me I can tell a
judge in court.
3. You have the right to have your parent, guardian, or custodian
with you while you talk to me.
4. You have the right to have a lawyer with you while you talk to
me. You may have the right to get a free lawyer. If you get a lawyer, he
or she can help you if you decide that you want to talk to me.
5. These are your rights. Do you understand what I have told you?
6. Do you want to talk to me?"
(4) A peace officer who takes a young adult into custody shall
immediately take reasonable measures to notify the young adult's parent,
guardian, custodian, or adult relative. The peace officer shall describe
to the young adult the efforts the peace officer has made.
(5) If a young adult requests to speak to a parent, guardian,
custodian, or attorney before or during a custodial interrogation, the
-6-

LB700 LB700
2025 2025
custodial interrogation of the young adult must cease until such other
person arrives.
(6)(a) Except as provided in subdivision (6)(b) of this section,
upon arrival of a parent, guardian, or custodian to whom the young adult
has requested to speak, the peace officer shall without unnecessary delay
permit such other person to see and consult with the young adult alone
and in private at the place of custody. Prior to any custodial
interrogation with such person present, the peace officer shall provide
the advisement described in subsection (3) of this section to the young
adult and such other person.
(b) Subdivision (6)(a) of this section does not apply when there is
reasonable suspicion to believe that the parent, guardian, or custodian
is involved in a crime related to the young adult's detention or is a
danger to the young adult.
(7) Any statement of a young adult taken in violation of this
section shall not be admissible against the young adult in any criminal
proceeding or any proceeding under the Nebraska Juvenile Code.
Sec. 6. Section 29-2204, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
29-2204 (1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section and
except when a term of life imprisonment is required by law, in imposing a
sentence upon an offender for any class of felony other than a Class III,
IIIA, or IV felony, the court shall fix the minimum and the maximum terms
of the sentence to be served within the limits provided by law. The
maximum term shall not be greater than the maximum limit provided by law,
and:
(a) The minimum term fixed by the court shall be any term of years
less than the maximum term imposed by the court; or
(b) The minimum term shall be the minimum limit provided by law.
(2) In imposing a sentence for a Class IA or IB felony upon an
offender who was under twenty-two years of age at the time of the
-7-

LB700 LB700
2025 2025
offense, the court shall fix the minimum and the maximum terms of the
sentence as provided in section 28-105.02.
(3) (2) When a maximum term of life is imposed by the court for a
Class IB felony for an offender who was twenty-two years of age or older
at the time of the offense, the minimum term fixed by the court shall be:
(a) Any term of years not less than the minimum limit provided by
law; or
(b) A term of life imprisonment.
(4) (3) When a maximum term of life is imposed by the court for a
Class IA felony for an offender who was twenty-two years of age or older
at the time of the offense, the minimum term fixed by the court shall be
a :(a) A term of life imprisonment. ; or
(b) Any term of years not less than the minimum limit provided by
law after consideration of the mitigating factors in section 28-105.02,
if the defendant was under eighteen years of age at the time he or she
committed the crime for which he or she was convicted.
(5) (4) When the court is of the opinion that imprisonment may be
appropriate but desires more detailed information as a basis for
determining the sentence to be imposed than has been provided by the
presentence report required by section 29-2261, the court may commit an
offender to the Department of Correctional Services. During that time,
the department shall conduct a complete study of the offender as provided
in section 29-2204.03.
(6) Whenever (5) Except when a term of life is required by law,
whenever the defendant was under eighteen years of age at the time he or
she committed the crime for which he or she was convicted, the court may,
in its discretion, instead of imposing the penalty provided for the
crime, make such disposition of the defendant as the court deems proper
under the Nebraska Juvenile Code.
(7)(a) (6)(a) When imposing an indeterminate sentence upon an
offender under this section, the court shall:
-8-

LB700 LB700
2025 2025
(i) Advise the offender on the record the time the offender will
serve on his or her minimum term before attaining parole eligibility
assuming that no good time for which the offender will be eligible is
lost; and
(ii) Advise the offender on the record the time the offender will
serve on his or her maximum term before attaining mandatory release
assuming that no good time for which the offender will be eligible is
lost.
(b) If any discrepancy exists between the statement of the minimum
limit of the sentence and the statement of parole eligibility or between
the statement of the maximum limit of the sentence and the statement of
mandatory release, the statements of the minimum limit and the maximum
limit shall control the calculation of the offender's term.
(c) If the court imposes more than one sentence upon an offender or
imposes a sentence upon an offender who is at that time serving another
sentence, the court shall state whether the sentences are to be
concurrent or consecutive.
Sec. 7. Section 43-245, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
43-245 For purposes of the Nebraska Juvenile Code, unless the
context otherwise requires:
(1) Abandonment means a parent's intentionally withholding from a
child, without just cause or excuse, the parent's presence, care, love,
protection, and maintenance and the opportunity for the display of
parental affection for the child;
(2) Age of majority means:
(a) Nineteen nineteen years of age; or
(b) Twenty-six years of age for a person who has been adjudicated in
juvenile court for a Class IA or IB felony;
(3) Alternative to detention means a program or directive that
increases supervision of a youth in the community in an effort to ensure
-9-

LB700 LB700
2025 2025
the youth attends court and refrains from committing a new law violation.
Alternative to detention includes, but is not limited to, electronic
monitoring, day and evening reporting centers, house arrest, tracking,
family crisis response, and temporary shelter placement. Except for the
use of manually controlled delayed egress of not more than thirty
seconds, placements that utilize physical construction or hardware to
restrain a youth's freedom of movement and ingress and egress from
placement are not considered alternatives to detention;
(4) Approved center means a center that has applied for and received
approval from the Director of the Office of Dispute Resolution under
section 25-2909;
(5) Civil citation means a noncriminal notice which cannot result in
a criminal record and is described in section 43-248.02;
(6) Cost or costs means (a) the sum or equivalent expended, paid, or
charged for goods or services, or expenses incurred, or (b) the
contracted or negotiated price;
(7) Criminal street gang means a group of three or more people with
a common identifying name, sign, or symbol whose group identity or
purposes include engaging in illegal activities;
(8) Criminal street gang member means a person who willingly or
voluntarily becomes and remains a member of a criminal street gang;
(9) Custodian means a nonparental caretaker having physical custody
of the juvenile and includes an appointee described in section 43-294;
(10) Guardian means a person, other than a parent, who has qualified
by law as the guardian of a juvenile pursuant to testamentary or court
appointment, but excludes a person who is merely a guardian ad litem;
(11) Juvenile means:
(a) Any any person under the age of eighteen; or
(b) Any person under the age of twenty-six who has been adjudicated
in juvenile court for a Class IA or IB felony;
(12) Juvenile court means the separate juvenile court where it has
-10-

LB700 LB700
2025 2025
been established pursuant to sections 43-2,111 to 43-2,127 and the county
court sitting as a juvenile court in all other counties. Nothing in the
Nebraska Juvenile Code shall be construed to deprive the district courts
of their habeas corpus, common-law, or chancery jurisdiction or the
county courts and district courts of jurisdiction of domestic relations
matters as defined in section 25-2740;
(13) Juvenile detention facility has the same meaning as in section
83-4,125;
(14) Legal custody has the same meaning as in section 43-2922;
(15) Mental health facility means a treatment facility as defined in
section 71-914 or a government, private, or state hospital which treats
mental illness;
(16) Nonoffender means a juvenile who is subject to the jurisdiction
of the juvenile court for reasons other than legally prohibited conduct,
including, but not limited to, juveniles described in subdivision (3)(a)
or (b) of section 43-247;
(17) Parent means one or both parents or stepparents when the
stepparent is married to a parent who has physical custody of the
juvenile as of the filing of the petition;
(18) Parties means the juvenile as described in section 43-247 and
his or her parent, guardian, or custodian;
(19) Physical custody has the same meaning as in section 43-2922;
(20) Except in proceedings under the Nebraska Indian Child Welfare
Act, relative means father, mother, grandfather, grandmother, brother,
sister, stepfather, stepmother, stepbrother, stepsister, uncle, aunt,
first cousin, nephew, or niece;
(21) Restorative justice means practices, programs, or services that
emphasize repairing the harm caused to victims and the community by
persons who have caused the harm or committed an offense. Restorative
justice practices may include, but are not limited to, victim youth
conferencing, victim-offender mediation, youth or community dialogue,
-11-

LB700 LB700
2025 2025
panels, circles, and truancy mediation;
(22) Restorative justice facilitator means a qualified individual
who has been trained to facilitate restorative justice practices. A
qualified individual shall be approved by the referring county attorney,
city attorney, or juvenile or county court judge. Factors for approval
may include, but are not limited to, an individual's education and
training in restorative justice principles and practices; experience in
facilitating restorative justice sessions; understanding of the necessity
to do no harm to either the victim or the person who harmed the victim;
and proven commitment to ethical practices;
(23) Seal a record means that a record shall not be available to the
public except upon the order of a court upon good cause shown;
(24) Secure detention means detention in a highly structured,
residential, hardware-secured facility designed to restrict a juvenile's
movement;
(25) Staff secure juvenile facility means a juvenile residential
facility operated by a political subdivision or which a political
subdivision contracts to have operated (a) which does not include
construction designed to physically restrict the movements and activities
of juveniles who are in custody in the facility, (b) in which physical
restriction of movement or activity of juveniles is provided solely
through staff, (c) which may establish reasonable rules restricting
ingress to and egress from the facility, and (d) in which the movements
and activities of individual juvenile residents may, for treatment
purposes, be restricted or subject to control through the use of
intensive staff supervision. Staff secure juvenile facility does not
include any institution operated by the Department of Correctional
Services;
(26) Status offender means a juvenile who has been charged with or
adjudicated for conduct which would not be a crime if committed by an
adult, including, but not limited to, juveniles charged under subdivision
-12-

LB700 LB700
2025 2025
(3)(b) of section 43-247 and sections 53-180.01 and 53-180.02;
(27) Traffic offense means any nonfelonious act in violation of a
law or ordinance regulating vehicular or pedestrian travel, whether
designated a misdemeanor or a traffic infraction; and
(28) Young adult means an individual older than eighteen years of
age but under twenty-one years of age.
Sec. 8. Section 43-248.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
43-248.01 (1) All law enforcement personnel or other governmental
officials having custody of any individual person under eighteen years of
age shall inform the individual person in custody, using developmentally
appropriate language and without unnecessary delay, of such individual's
person's right to call or consult an attorney who is retained by or
appointed on behalf of such individual person or whom the individual
person may desire to consult and, except when exigent circumstances
exist, shall permit such individual person to call or consult such
attorney without delay. An attorney shall be permitted to see and consult
with the individual person in custody alone and in private at the place
of custody.
(2) Before initiating a custodial interrogation of an individual
under eighteen years of age, law enforcement personnel shall provide an
advisement to the individual in substantially the following form:
"1. You have the right to remain silent, which means you do not have
to say anything to me unless you want to. It is your choice.
2. If you choose to talk to me, whatever you tell me I can tell a
judge in court.
3. You have the right to have your parent, guardian, or custodian
with you while you talk to me.
4. You have the right to have a lawyer with you while you talk to
me. You may have the right to get a free lawyer. If you get a lawyer, he
or she can help you if you decide that you want to talk to me.
-13-

LB700 LB700
2025 2025
5. These are your rights. Do you understand what I have told you?
6. Do you want to talk to me?"
(3) A peace officer who takes an individual under eighteen years of
age into custody under section 29-401 or subdivision (1), (4), (5), or
(8) of section 43-248 shall describe to the individual the efforts the
peace officer has taken to notify the individual's parent, guardian, or
custodian as provided for in section 43-250.
(4) If an individual under eighteen years of age requests to speak
to a parent, guardian, custodian, or attorney before or during a
custodial interrogation, the custodial interrogation of the individual
must cease until such other person arrives.
(5)(a) Except as provided in subdivision (5)(b) of this section,
upon arrival of a parent, guardian, or custodian to whom the individual
under eighteen years of age has requested to speak, the peace officer
shall without unnecessary delay permit such other person to see and
consult with the individual alone and in private at the place of custody.
Prior to any custodial interrogation with such person present, the peace
officer shall provide the advisement described in subsection (2) of this
section to the individual and such other person.
(b) Subdivision (5)(a) of this section does not apply when there is
reasonable suspicion to believe that the parent, guardian, or custodian
is involved in a crime related to the individual's detention or is a
danger to the individual.
(6) Any statement of an individual taken in violation of this
section shall not be admissible against the individual in any criminal
proceeding or any proceeding under the Nebraska Juvenile Code.
(7) For purposes of this section, custodial interrogation has the
meaning prescribed to it under the Fourth and Fifth Amendments to the
Constitution of the United States and Article I, sections 3 and 7, of the
Constitution of Nebraska, as interpreted by the Supreme Court of the
United States and the Nebraska Supreme Court.
-14-

LB700 LB700
2025 2025
Sec. 9. Section 43-249, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
43-249 No juvenile taken into temporary custody under section 43-248
shall be considered to have been arrested, except for the purpose of
determining the validity of such custody under the Constitution of
Nebraska or the Constitution of the United States and determining whether
there has been compliance with section 43-248.01.
Sec. 10. Section 43-250, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
43-250 (1) A peace officer who takes a juvenile into temporary
custody under section 29-401 or subdivision (1), (2), (3), or (7) of
section 43-248 shall:
(a) Immediately immediately take reasonable measures to notify the
juvenile's parent, guardian, or custodian: ,
(i) That the juvenile is in custody; or relative and shall proceed
as follows:
(ii) Of the juvenile's current location and where the juvenile will
be transferred, if applicable; and
(iii) Of the reason the juvenile was taken into custody unless the
peace officer has a reasonable suspicion that the disclosure of such
reason will jeopardize public safety or the integrity of the
investigation; and
(b) Proceed as follows:
(i) (a) The peace officer may release a juvenile taken into
temporary custody under section 29-401 or subdivision (1), (2), or (7) of
section 43-248;
(ii) (b) The peace officer may require a juvenile taken into
temporary custody under section 29-401 or subdivision (1) or (2) of
section 43-248 to appear before the court of the county in which such
juvenile was taken into custody at a time and place specified in the
written notice prepared in triplicate by the peace officer or at the call
-15-

LB700 LB700
2025 2025
of the court. The notice shall also contain a concise statement of the
reasons such juvenile was taken into custody. The peace officer shall
deliver one copy of the notice to such juvenile and require such juvenile
or his or her parent, guardian, other custodian, or adult relative, or
both, to sign a written promise that such signer will appear at the time
and place designated in the notice. Upon the execution of the promise to
appear, the peace officer shall immediately release such juvenile. The
peace officer shall, as soon as practicable, file one copy of the notice
with the county attorney or city attorney and, when required by the
court, also file a copy of the notice with the court or the officer
appointed by the court for such purpose; or
(iii) (c) The peace officer may retain temporary custody of a
juvenile taken into temporary custody under section 29-401 or subdivision
(1), (2), or (3) of section 43-248 and deliver the juvenile, if
necessary, to the probation officer and communicate all relevant
available information regarding such juvenile to the probation officer.
The probation officer shall determine the need for detention of the
juvenile as provided in section 43-260.01. Upon determining that the
juvenile should be placed in detention or an alternative to detention and
securing placement in such setting by the probation officer, the peace
officer shall implement the probation officer's decision to release or to
detain and place the juvenile. When secure detention of a juvenile is
necessary, such detention shall occur within a juvenile detention
facility except:
(A) (i) When a juvenile described in subdivision (1) or (2) of
section 43-247, except for a status offender, is taken into temporary
custody within a metropolitan statistical area and where no juvenile
detention facility is reasonably available, the juvenile may be
delivered, for temporary custody not to exceed six hours, to a secure
area of a jail or other facility intended or used for the detention of
adults solely for the purposes of identifying the juvenile and
-16-

LB700 LB700
2025 2025
ascertaining his or her health and well-being and for safekeeping while
awaiting transport to an appropriate juvenile placement or release to a
responsible party;
(B) (ii) When a juvenile described in subdivision (1) or (2) of
section 43-247, except for a status offender, is taken into temporary
custody outside of a metropolitan statistical area and where no juvenile
detention facility is reasonably available, the juvenile may be
delivered, for temporary custody not to exceed twenty-four hours
excluding nonjudicial days and while awaiting an initial court
appearance, to a secure area of a jail or other facility intended or used
for the detention of adults solely for the purposes of identifying the
juvenile and ascertaining his or her health and well-being and for
safekeeping while awaiting transport to an appropriate juvenile placement
or release to a responsible party;
(C) (iii) Whenever a juvenile is held in a secure area of any jail
or other facility intended or used for the detention of adults, there
shall be no verbal, visual, or physical contact between the juvenile and
any incarcerated adult and there shall be adequate staff to supervise and
monitor the juvenile's activities at all times. This subdivision shall
not apply to a juvenile charged with a felony as an adult in county or
district court if he or she is sixteen years of age or older;
(D) (iv) If a juvenile is under sixteen years of age or is a
juvenile as described in subdivision (3) of section 43-247, he or she
shall not be placed within a secure area of a jail or other facility
intended or used for the detention of adults;
(v) If, within the time limits specified in subdivision (1)(c)(i) or
(1)(c)(ii) of this section, a felony charge is filed against the juvenile
as an adult in county or district court, he or she may be securely held
in a jail or other facility intended or used for the detention of adults
beyond the specified time limits;
(E) (vi) A status offender or nonoffender taken into temporary
-17-

LB700 LB700
2025 2025
custody shall not be held in a secure area of a jail or other facility
intended or used for the detention of adults; and
(F) (vii) A juvenile described in subdivision (1) or (2) of section
43-247, except for a status offender, may be held in a secure area of a
jail or other facility intended or used for the detention of adults for
up to six hours before and six hours after any court appearance.
(2) A juvenile taken into custody pursuant to a legal warrant of
arrest shall be delivered to a probation officer who shall determine the
need for detention of the juvenile as provided in section 43-260.01. If
detention is not required, the juvenile may be released without bond if
such release is in the best interests of the juvenile, the safety of the
community is not at risk, and the court that issued the warrant is
notified that the juvenile had been taken into custody and was released.
(3) In determining the appropriate temporary placement or
alternative to detention of a juvenile under this section, the peace
officer shall select the placement or alternative which is least
restrictive of the juvenile's freedom so long as such placement or
alternative is compatible with the best interests of the juvenile and the
safety of the community. Any alternative to detention shall cause the
least restriction of the juvenile's freedom of movement consistent with
the best interests of the juvenile and the safety of the community.
(4) When a juvenile is taken into temporary custody pursuant to
subdivision (4) of section 43-248, the peace officer shall deliver the
juvenile to the enrolled school of such juvenile.
(5) When a juvenile is taken into temporary custody pursuant to
subdivision (5), (6), or (7) of section 43-248, and not released under
subdivision (1)(b)(i) (1)(a) of this section, the peace officer shall
deliver the custody of such juvenile to the Department of Health and
Human Services which shall make a temporary placement of the juvenile in
the least restrictive environment consistent with the best interests of
the juvenile as determined by the department. The department shall
-18-

LB700 LB700
2025 2025
supervise such placement and, if necessary, consent to any necessary
emergency medical, psychological, or psychiatric treatment for such
juvenile. The department shall have no other authority with regard to
such temporary custody until or unless there is an order by the court
placing the juvenile in the custody of the department. If the peace
officer delivers temporary custody of the juvenile pursuant to this
subsection, the peace officer shall make a full written report to the
county attorney within twenty-four hours of taking such juvenile into
temporary custody. If a court order of temporary custody is not issued
within forty-eight hours of taking the juvenile into custody, the
temporary custody by the department shall terminate and the juvenile
shall be returned to the custody of his or her parent, guardian,
custodian, or adult relative.
(6) If the peace officer takes the juvenile into temporary custody
pursuant to subdivision (8) of section 43-248, the peace officer may
place the juvenile at a mental health facility for evaluation and
emergency treatment or may deliver the juvenile to the Department of
Health and Human Services as provided in subsection (5) of this section.
At the time of the admission or turning the juvenile over to the
department, the peace officer responsible for taking the juvenile into
custody pursuant to subdivision (8) of section 43-248 shall execute a
written certificate as prescribed by the department which will indicate
that the peace officer believes the juvenile to be mentally ill and
dangerous, a summary of the subject's behavior supporting such
allegations, and that the harm described in section 71-908 is likely to
occur before proceedings before a juvenile court may be invoked to obtain
custody of the juvenile. A copy of the certificate shall be forwarded to
the county attorney. The peace officer shall notify the juvenile's
parents, guardian, custodian, or adult relative of the juvenile's
placement.
Sec. 11. Section 43-253, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
-19-

LB700 LB700
2025 2025
2024, is amended to read:
43-253 (1) Upon delivery to the probation officer of a juvenile who
has been taken into temporary custody under section 29-401, 43-248, or
43-250, the probation officer shall immediately investigate the situation
of the juvenile and the nature and circumstances of the events
surrounding his or her being taken into custody. Such investigation may
be by informal means when appropriate.
(2) The probation officer's decision to release the juvenile from
custody or place the juvenile in detention or an alternative to detention
shall be based upon the results of the standardized juvenile detention
screening instrument described in section 43-260.01.
(3) No juvenile who has been taken into temporary custody under
subdivision (1)(b)(iii) (1)(c) of section 43-250 or subsection (6) of
section 43-286.01 or pursuant to an alleged violation of an order for
conditional release shall be detained in any detention facility or be
subject to an alternative to detention infringing upon the juvenile's
liberty interest for longer than twenty-four hours, excluding nonjudicial
days, after having been taken into custody unless such juvenile has
appeared personally before a court of competent jurisdiction for a
hearing to determine if continued detention, services, or supervision is
necessary. The juvenile shall be represented by counsel at the hearing.
Whether such counsel shall be provided at the cost of the county shall be
determined as provided in subsection (1) of section 43-272. If continued
secure detention is ordered, such detention shall be in a juvenile
detention facility , except that a juvenile charged with a felony as an
adult in county or district court may be held in an adult jail as set
forth in subdivision (1)(c)(v) of section 43-250. A juvenile placed in an
alternative to detention, but not in detention, may waive this hearing
through counsel.
(4) When the probation officer deems it to be in the best interests
of the juvenile, the probation officer shall immediately release such
-20-

LB700 LB700
2025 2025
juvenile to the custody of his or her parent. If the juvenile has both a
custodial and a noncustodial parent and the probation officer deems that
release of the juvenile to the custodial parent is not in the best
interests of the juvenile, the probation officer shall, if it is deemed
to be in the best interests of the juvenile, attempt to contact the
noncustodial parent, if any, of the juvenile and to release the juvenile
to such noncustodial parent. If such release is not possible or not
deemed to be in the best interests of the juvenile, the probation officer
may release the juvenile to the custody of a legal guardian, a
responsible adult relative, or another responsible adult person.
(5) The court may admit such juvenile to bail by bond in such amount
and on such conditions and security as the court, in its sole discretion,
shall determine, or the court may proceed as provided in section 43-254.
In no case shall the court or probation officer release such juvenile if
it appears that:
(a) The physical safety of persons in the community would be
seriously threatened; or
(b) Detention is necessary to secure the presence of the juvenile at
the next hearing, as evidenced by a demonstrable record of willful
failure to appear at a scheduled court hearing within the last twelve
months.
Sec. 12. The Department of Health and Human Services and Office of
Probation Administration shall use day reporting and evening reporting
centers as appropriate for juveniles who are being provided services
under the Nebraska Juvenile Code. The department and office may adopt and
promulgate rules and regulations as necessary to select, oversee, and
reimburse such centers.
Sec. 13. A juvenile who has been adjudicated under the Nebraska
Juvenile Code shall not be transferred out of state by a county or any
state agency unless necessary for emergency medical or mental treatment
services.
-21-

LB700 LB700
2025 2025
Sec. 14. (1) This section applies beginning January 1, 2026.
(2) Any adjudication of a juvenile under subdivision (1) or (2) of
section 43-247 shall be conducted in such a manner as to maintain the
confidentiality of the identity of the juvenile. This applies to all
stages of such proceedings, including before, during, or after
adjudication and disposition and during any post-disposition proceedings.
(3) A court shall release information required to be confidential by
this section:
(a) To any individual; public or private agency, institution,
facility, or clinic; or governmental entity which is providing services
directly to the juvenile;
(b) To any court which has jurisdiction of the juvenile upon such
court's request;
(c) Upon written request by the office of Public Counsel, including
the office of Inspector General of Nebraska Child Welfare and office of
Inspector General of the Nebraska Correctional System;
(d) To any person, at the request of the juvenile;
(e) To law enforcement officers, county attorneys, and city
attorneys;
(f) To any person as necessary for the custody and care of such
juvenile;
(g) To the Department of Health and Human Services;
(h) To persons engaged in bona fide research, with the permission of
the court or the State Court Administrator, only if the research results
in no disclosure of the juvenile's identity and protects the
confidentiality of the juvenile;
(i) To a law enforcement agency if the juvenile applies for
employment with the law enforcement agency; and
(j) To public or private entities responsible for locating or
assisting in the location of a juvenile who is a fugitive from justice or
otherwise missing, except that this shall not authorize the dissemination
-22-

LB700 LB700
2025 2025
of any information required to be confidential by this section to the
media or on social media, unless there is reason to believe the juvenile
has been kidnapped or is at risk of physical harm.
(4) Any person receiving confidential information under subsection
(3) of this section shall maintain the confidentiality of such
information and of the juvenile's identity.
Sec. 15. Section 43-2,129, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
43-2,129 Sections 43-245 to 43-2,129 and sections 12 to 14 of this
act shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Juvenile Code.
Sec. 16. Original sections 28-105.02, 29-401, 43-248.01, and
43-249, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, and sections 28-105.01,
29-2204, 43-245, 43-250, 43-253, and 43-2,129, Revised Statutes
Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
-23-